California, session 20252026, AB2241.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Play is recognized by human rights authorities as a fundamental right for every child and is essential for physical, social, and cognitive development for disabled and nondisabled children alike. Playgrounds should enable children and adults of different abilities to play together, fostering integration, empathy, and learning. Inclusive playgrounds remove barriers and add accessibility features to ensure that children of all backgrounds, ages, and physical abilities play together without limitations.(b) Federal standards mandate basic accessibility but do not ensure inclusive play features. Other jurisdictions have gone further. New Jersey’s Jake’s Law requires state agencies to adopt playground design regulations that exceed federal minimum standards and gives funding preference to fully inclusive playgrounds. The Province of Ontario requires that new public play spaces be designed through consultation with people with disabilities and include firm, level surfacing, accessible routes, and sensory play components. These models demonstrate effective approaches to ensure playgrounds truly serve individuals of all abilities.(c) Globally, governments promote inclusive play. For example, Australia’s Everyone Can Play program funded over 140 inclusive playgrounds with government grants and published design guidelines; its stakeholder advisory group included disability advocates and planners. South Australia’s Inclusive Play guidelines were created by a working group of experts in disability, child development, sports and recreation, built environments, and families of children with disabilities. Such international efforts reflect best practices in multisector collaboration on play equity. Similarly, Nova Scotia’s new Accessibility Act standards will require all new parks and recreation facilities to be accessible. Even charitable initiatives, for example, Canada’s Jumpstart Program, have shown the impact of building barrier-free playgrounds to engage children of diverse abilities.(d) Despite these successes elsewhere, many California playgrounds remain inaccessible or sensory-limited. To align with inclusive best practices and California’s civil rights values, there is a need for inclusive playground standards, a funding preference for inclusive play projects, and expert oversight to guide design and outreach led by a dedicated advisory committee of specialists that will ensure that California’s playgrounds meet modern universal-design goals and community needs, similar to advisory bodies used in other jurisdictions.SEC. 2. Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 17680) is added to Part 10.5 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to read: CHAPTER 10. California Inclusive School Playgrounds Act17680. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Inclusive School Playgrounds Act.17681. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:(a) “Committee” means the Inclusive Playground School Advisory Committee established pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17682.(b)“Grant program” means any funding or grant program administered by the department that is authorized to be used for school playground development. (c)(b) “Inclusive design standards” means the model guidelines for inclusive school playgrounds in the state developed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17683.(d)(c) “Inclusive school playground” means an outdoor play area at a public school that is designed and constructed to ensure that pupils who are individuals with physical, sensory, intellectual, or developmental disabilities can play together with nondisabled pupils. An inclusive school playground incorporates universal design features beyond minimum accessibility requirements, including, but not limited to, accessible surfacing and ramps, integrated adaptive swings and equipment, sensory-rich elements, clear wayfinding, shaded quiet areas, and other features enabling physical, cognitive, and social play by pupils who are individuals with disabilities.17682. (a) The Inclusive Playground Advisory Committee is hereby established within the department.(b) The committee shall consist of all of the following members:(1) Two members with demonstrated expertise in disability advocacy or policy, at least one of whom is an advocate for children with disabilities, to be appointed by the Governor.(2) One member who is a licensed occupational therapist with experience in pediatric rehabilitation or inclusive play to be appointed by the Governor.(3) One member with demonstrated expertise in child development or early childhood education to be appointed by the Governor.(4) One member with demonstrated expertise in universal design or accessible architecture to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(5) One member with demonstrated expertise in recreation, parks management, or urban planning, particularly relating to school playground design, to be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.(6) Two parents or guardians of pupils who are individuals with disabilities, one of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules President pro Tempore of the Senate and one of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(7) One representative of a community-based organization that builds or advocates for the building of inclusive school playgrounds, to be appointed by the department.(8) Four representatives from school districts, county offices of education, or charter schools with school facilities and accessible playground experience, two of whom shall be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate and two of whom shall be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.(9) The State Architect or their designee.(10) The executive officer of the Office of Public School Construction or their designee.(c) Members of the committee shall collectively represent a mix of disciplines, perspectives, and experience with a diverse range of disabilities.(d) The Superintendent shall designate a committee chair from among the members.(e) (1) Each member shall serve a term of four years, except as provided in paragraph (2).(2) For the first term after the committee is initially established, the department shall determine the length of the term for each member in order to stagger terms so that approximately one-half of the members’ terms expire every two years.(f) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment described in subdivision (b) for the remainder of the unexpired term.(g) The committee shall meet no less than twice per year or more frequently if needed to fulfill its duties.(h) The committee may form subcommittees or working groups as needed.(i) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may be reimbursed for reasonable travel or other expenses incurred in the performance of their duties, as authorized by the department’s regulations.17683. The committee shall do all of the following:(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, coordinate with the department to develop and publish model guidelines for inclusive school playgrounds in the state.(2) Guidelines developed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect universal design principles and address equipment selection, surfacing, sensory features, safety, and maintenance.(3) In developing the guidelines pursuant to this subdivision, the committee shall consider socioeconomic factors, including the needs of underserved, rural, and special needs communities.(b)(1)Review proposed inclusive school playground designs submitted by local educational agencies seeking state funding and provide technical feedback to ensure designs meet inclusive design standards.(2)The review process shall draw on established standards and local best practices from successful inclusive school playgrounds. (c)(b) In consultation with relevant state and local agencies, recommend requirements or incentives to encourage inclusive features in school playground projects.(d)Conduct periodic assessments to identify communities that lack inclusive school playgrounds. (e)(c) Collaborate with advocacy and parent organizations to host forums or develop resources on inclusive school playgrounds.(f)(d) Educate local educational agencies about the benefits of inclusive school playgrounds and the inclusive design standards.(g)(e) Coordinate with other state agencies to align inclusive school playground efforts with broader accessibility and child development goals.(h)(f) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, and every five years thereafter, submit a report to the Legislature on inclusive school playgrounds that includes, but is not limited to, recommendations on resource allocation.(2) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.17684.(a)On or before July 1, 2027, to the extent not in conflict with state or federal law, the department shall identify any grant programs within the department that fund school playgrounds and amend guidelines for those grant programs to prioritize proposed projects that meet the inclusive design standards.(b)The department shall collaborate with other state agencies to encourage funding mechanisms for other playgrounds to similarly incentivize projects that meet inclusive design standards.17685.17684. (a) The department shall support the implementation of this chapter with existing funding allowable for these purposes or through grant funding.(b)The department may pursue partnerships to supplement state funding to support the implementation of this chapter.(b) (1) The department may review proposed inclusive school playground designs submitted by local educational agencies seeking state funding and provide technical feedback to ensure designs meet inclusive design standards.(2) The review process is encouraged to draw on established standards and local best practices from successful inclusive school playgrounds.17686.17685. The department state board may adopt regulations to implement this chapter.